District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.27

Acquisition of land for Washington Aqueduct.

Appropriations are hereby authorized for the acquisition, by gift, dedication, exchange, purchase, or condemnation, of land or rights in or on land or easements therein for the Washington Aqueduct by the Chief of Engineers, Corps of Engineers, United States Army, or his designated agents.

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 507, Pub. L. 93-140, § 18

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1554.
1973 Ed., § 43-1543.

Prior Codifications